Nebraska statutes.
Sec. 16.Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska85-1918
Annual report.

Each
eligible postsecondary educational institution shall file an annual report
with the commission. The report shall document that students receiving awards
under the Nebraska Opportunity Grant Act have
met the eligibility standards and requirements established in the act and
rules and regulations. The report shall include an accounting of all state-funded
or federally funded student financial aid awarded by the eligible postsecondary
educational institution in the previous fiscal year. The report may include
other data, including the unmet need as defined by the commission for all
Federal-Pell-Grant-eligible students at each eligible postsecondary educational
institution.

Laws 2003, LB 574, § 18;

Laws 2010, LB956, § 16.